Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 9 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 10 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 11 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,062,310 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 420.00 14 2. Of the amount appropriated in subsection 1, the following 15 amount is transferred to Iowa state university of science and 16 technology, to be used for the universityâs midwest grape and 17 wine industry institute: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 325,000 19 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 20 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 21 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 22 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this section to support 23 the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 24 Sec. 2. UNCLAIMED PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING WINNINGS ââ 25 HORSE AND DOG RACING. There is appropriated from the moneys 26 available under section 99D.13 to the department of agriculture 27 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 28 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 29 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 30 designated: 31 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs administration 32 and enforcement of horse and dog racing law pursuant to section 33 99D.22 , including for salaries, support, maintenance, and 34 miscellaneous purposes: 35 -1- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 1/ 22 S.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 305,516 1 Sec. 3. RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ MOTOR 2 FUEL INSPECTION. There is appropriated from the renewable 3 fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 to the 4 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 6 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of the inspection of motor fuel, including 9 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 11 Sec. 4. SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND ââ BUTCHERY 12 INNOVATION AND REVITALIZATION PROGRAM. 13 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and 14 job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the department of 15 agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning 16 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 17 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 18 designated: 19 For support of the butchery innovation and revitalization 20 program established pursuant to 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 21 1148, section 28, to award financial assistance to eligible 22 businesses for projects based on criteria described in section 23 15E.370: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249,695 25 2. The department may use not more than 5 percent of the 26 moneys appropriated in subsection 1 to pay for the costs of 27 administering the program described in subsection 1. 28 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 29 subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 30 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 31 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 32 close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027. 33 Sec. 5. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 34 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 35 -2- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 2/ 22 S.F. _____ state to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 2 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 3 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 4 1. DAIRY REGULATION 5 a. For purposes of performing functions pursuant to section 6 192.109 , including conducting a survey of grade âAâ milk and 7 certifying the results to the secretary of agriculture: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 189,196 9 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 10 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 11 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 12 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 13 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 14 2. LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM 15 a. For purposes of supporting the local food and farm 16 program pursuant to chapter 267A : 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 18 b. The department shall enter into a cost-sharing agreement 19 with Iowa state university of science and technology to support 20 the local food and farm program coordinator position as part of 21 the universityâs cooperative extension service in agriculture 22 and home economics pursuant to chapter 267A . 23 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 24 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 25 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 26 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 27 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 28 3. AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION 29 a. For purposes of allocating moneys to an Iowa association 30 affiliated with a national organization that promotes 31 agricultural education providing for future farmers: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 33 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 34 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 35 -3- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 3/ 22 S.F. _____ close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 1 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 2 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3 4. FOREIGN ANIMAL DISEASES AFFLICTING LIVESTOCK 4 a. For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 5 and response fund created in section 163.3B to further 6 implement a foreign animal disease preparedness and response 7 strategy as described in section 163.3C: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,050,000 9 b. For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 10 and response fund created in section 163.3B, for purposes 11 of purchasing and maintaining equipment to further the 12 implementation of the foreign animal disease preparedness and 13 response strategy developed under section 163.3C: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 15 5. FARMERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM 16 a. For purposes of supporting a program for farmers with 17 disabilities: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 230,000 19 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 20 used for the public purpose of providing a grant to a national 21 nonprofit organization with over 80 years of experience in 22 assisting children and adults with disabilities and special 23 needs. The moneys shall be used to support a nationally 24 recognized program that began in 1986 and has been replicated 25 in at least 30 other states, but is not available through 26 any other entity in this state, and that provides assistance 27 to farmers with disabilities in all 99 counties to allow the 28 farmers to remain in their own homes and be gainfully engaged 29 in farming through provision of agricultural worksite and home 30 modification consultations, peer support services, services 31 to families, information and referral, and equipment loan 32 services. 33 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 34 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 35 -4- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 4/ 22 S.F. _____ close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 1 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 2 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3 6. LOESS HILLS DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 4 a. For deposit in the loess hills development and 5 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.2 : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 7 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 8 $360,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs hungry canyons 9 account. 10 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 11 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 12 c. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 13 $40,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs loess hills alliance 14 account. 15 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 16 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 17 7. SOUTHERN IOWA DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 18 a. For deposit in the southern Iowa development and 19 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.12: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 21 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 22 this subsection may be used for administrative costs. 23 8. GRAIN REGULATION 24 For the administration and enforcement of chapters 203 25 and 203C , including salaries, support, maintenance, and 26 miscellaneous purposes: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350,000 28 9. CHOOSE IOWA FUND 29 a. For deposit in the choose Iowa fund created in section 30 187.201: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,813,000 32 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 33 the department shall use $463,000 to support the value-added 34 agricultural grant program created in section 187.321. 35 -5- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 5/ 22 S.F. _____ (2) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 1 department shall use $600,000 to support the choose Iowa 2 promotional program as provided in chapter 187, subchapter III, 3 part 1. 4 (3) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 5 department shall use $750,000 to support the dairy innovation 6 and revitalization program created in section 187.311. 7 c. The department may increase or decrease the amount of 8 moneys used to support a program described in paragraph âbâ 9 based on the amount of moneys awarded to persons participating 10 in the program. The department shall publish a notice of the 11 departmentâs action to increase or decrease the amount on the 12 departmentâs internet site where the programs are advertised at 13 least thirty days prior to the day that the department takes 14 such action. 15 10. CHOOSE IOWA FOOD PURCHASING PILOT PROJECT 16 a. For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa food 17 purchasing pilot project created in 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 18 1148, section 5, to assist eligible participants in purchasing 19 qualified food products: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 21 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 22 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 23 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 24 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 25 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 26 DIVISION II 27 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 28 Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND. 29 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 30 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year 31 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 32 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 33 purposes designated: 34 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 35 -6- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 6/ 22 S.F. _____ divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 1 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 2 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,500,000 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,145.95 5 2. Of the number of full-time equivalent positions 6 authorized to the department pursuant to subsection 1, 50.00 7 full-time equivalent positions shall be allocated by the 8 department for seasonal employees for purposes of providing 9 maintenance, upkeep, and sanitary services at state parks. 10 This subsection shall not impact conservation officer, park 11 ranger, or park manager positions within the department. 12 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 13 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 14 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 15 expenditure of moneys appropriated under this section to 16 support the departmentâs administration, regulation, and 17 programs. 18 Sec. 7. STATE FISH AND GAME PROTECTION FUND ââ REGULATION 19 AND ADVANCEMENT OF OUTDOOR ACTIVITIES. 20 1. There is appropriated from the state fish and game 21 protection fund created pursuant to section 456A.17 to the 22 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 23 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 24 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 25 designated: 26 For purposes of supporting the regulation or advancement of 27 hunting, fishing, or trapping, or the protection, propagation, 28 restoration, management, or harvest of fish or wildlife, 29 including for administration, regulation, law enforcement, and 30 programs; and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, 31 and miscellaneous purposes: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 51,404,790 33 2. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use 34 the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game 35 -7- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 7/ 22 S.F. _____ protection fund to provide for the funding of health and life 1 insurance premium payments from unused sick leave balances of 2 conservation peace officers employed in a protection occupation 3 who retire, pursuant to section 97B.49B . 4 3. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may 5 use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish 6 and game protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 7 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as is necessary to fund 8 salary adjustments for departmental employees for which the 9 general assembly has made an operating budget appropriation in 10 subsection 1. 11 Sec. 8. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ WATER QUALITY. There 12 is appropriated from the groundwater protection fund created 13 in section 455E.11 to the department of natural resources for 14 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 15 2026, from those moneys that are not allocated pursuant to 16 that section, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 17 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection 19 of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, 20 regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, 21 maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,455,850 23 Sec. 9. SPECIAL SNOWMOBILE FUND ââ SNOWMOBILE 24 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the special snowmobile 25 fund created under section 321G.7 to the department of natural 26 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 27 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 28 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 29 For purposes of administering and enforcing the state 30 snowmobile programs: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 32 Sec. 10. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 33 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 34 state to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 35 -8- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 8/ 22 S.F. _____ year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 1 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 2 used for the purposes designated: 3 1. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 4 a. For purposes of supporting floodplain management and dam 5 safety: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,510,000 7 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to 8 $400,000 may be used by the department to acquire or install 9 stream gages for purposes of tracking and predicting flood 10 events and for compiling necessary data to improve flood 11 frequency analysis. 12 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 13 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 14 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 15 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 16 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 17 2. FORESTRY HEALTH MANAGEMENT 18 a. For purposes of providing for forestry health management 19 programs: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 525,000 21 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 22 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 23 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 24 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 25 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 26 3. STATE PARK OPERATIONS 27 For supporting operations at state parks, including 28 maintenance and repair of grounds and facilities: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 30 DIVISION III 31 IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY 32 Sec. 11. SPECIAL GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is 33 appropriated from the general fund of the state to Iowa state 34 university of science and technology for the fiscal year 35 -9- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 9/ 22 S.F. _____ beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 1 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 2 purposes designated: 3 1. VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY 4 a. For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 5 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 6 laboratory, and for not more than the following full-time 7 equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,500,000 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 51.00 10 b. (1) Iowa state university of science and technology 11 shall not reduce the amount that it allocates to support the 12 college of veterinary medicine from any other source due to the 13 appropriation made in this subsection. 14 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a reduction made 15 to support the college of veterinary medicine if the same 16 percentage of reduction imposed on the college of veterinary 17 medicine is also imposed on all of Iowa state university of 18 science and technologyâs budget units. 19 c. If by June 30, 2026, Iowa state university of science 20 and technology fails to allocate the moneys appropriated in 21 this subsection to the college of veterinary medicine in 22 accordance with this subsection, the moneys appropriated in 23 this subsection for that fiscal year shall revert to the 24 general fund of the state. 25 2. MANAGEMENT OF PRIVATE FORESTS 26 a. For purposes of supporting the Iowa cooperative 27 extension service in agriculture and home economics in 28 providing technical support to landowners and loggers regarding 29 the management of private forests in northeast Iowa, and for 30 not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 33 b. The department of natural resources shall cooperate with 34 the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 35 -10- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 10/ 22 S.F. _____ economics in administering this subsection. 1 3. LIVESTOCK DISEASE RESEARCH 2 a. For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 3 created in section 267.8 : 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 291,390 5 b. Moneys appropriated under this subsection shall be used 6 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 7 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 8 producers. 9 Sec. 12. IOWA NUTRIENT REDUCTION FUND ââ VETERINARY 10 DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY. Notwithstanding section 466B.46, there 11 is appropriated from the Iowa nutrient research fund created 12 in section 466B.46 to Iowa state university of science and 13 technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 14 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 15 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 16 For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 17 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 18 laboratory: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 20 DIVISION IV 21 STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 22 Sec. 13. IOWAâS CENTER FOR AGRICULTURAL SAFETY AND HEALTH 23 (I-CASH). 24 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 25 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 26 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 27 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 28 designated: 29 For supporting the operations of Iowaâs center for 30 agricultural safety and health, as part of the universityâs 31 college of public health, and in cooperation with the 32 department of agriculture and land stewardship, to anticipate, 33 recognize, and prevent occupational illness and injury among 34 members of the agricultural community: 35 -11- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 11/ 22 S.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,154 1 2. a. As a condition of the appropriation made in 2 subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall retain the 3 director of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health 4 employed on the effective date of this division of this Act for 5 at least the same number of hours for the fiscal year beginning 6 July 1, 2025, as worked by the director during the fiscal year 7 beginning July 1, 2024. 8 b. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 9 1, the state university of Iowa shall not reduce the amount 10 allocated to support Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and 11 health from any other source due to the appropriation made in 12 subsection 1. 13 3. If by June 30, 2026, the state university of Iowa fails 14 to use the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 in accordance 15 with the purposes and conditions of subsections 1 and 2, any 16 unencumbered or unobligated moneys appropriated in subsection 17 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 18 30, 2026, shall revert to the general fund of the state. In 19 addition, if moneys revert as required pursuant to section 20 8.33 , the state university of Iowa shall transfer to the 21 general fund of the state from any otherwise unencumbered or 22 unobligated moneys from any other general fund appropriation or 23 from any moneys available from other funding sources an amount 24 equal to the amount appropriated in subsection 1 less any 25 amount that reverted to the general fund of the state pursuant 26 to section 8.33 . 27 DIVISION V 28 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS 29 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND 30 STEWARDSHIP. There is appropriated from the environment first 31 fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 32 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 33 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so 34 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 35 -12- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 12/ 22 S.F. _____ designated: 1 1. CONSERVATION RESERVE ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM (CREP) 2 a. For the conservation reserve enhancement program to 3 restore and construct wetlands for the purposes of intercepting 4 tile line runoff, reducing nutrient loss, improving water 5 quality, and enhancing agricultural production practices: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 7 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 8 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 9 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 10 c. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 11 department may use moneys appropriated in this subsection, 12 in combination with other appropriate environment first 13 fund appropriations, for cost sharing to match United States 14 department of agriculture, natural resources conservation 15 service, wetlands reserve enhancement program (WREP) funding 16 available to Iowa. 17 2. WATERSHED PROTECTION 18 a. For continuation of a program that provides 19 multiobjective resource protections for flood control, water 20 quality, erosion control, and natural resource conservation: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 22 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 23 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 24 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 25 3. CONSERVATION RESERVE PROGRAM (CRP) 26 a. To encourage and assist farmers in enrolling in and the 27 implementation of the federal conservation reserve program and 28 to work with them to enhance their revegetation efforts to 29 improve water quality and habitat: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 31 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 32 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 33 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 34 4. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION 35 -13- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 13/ 22 S.F. _____ a. For use by the department in providing for soil and water 1 conservation: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,325,000 3 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for 4 transfer to the hungry canyons account of the loess hills 5 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 140,000 7 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys transferred in 8 subparagraph (1) may be used for administrative costs. 9 c. Of the remaining amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, 10 for use by the department in providing for soil and water 11 conservation administration, the conservation of soil and 12 water resources, or the support of soil and water conservation 13 districts: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,185,000 15 d. Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âcâ that the 16 department allocates to a soil and water conservation district, 17 the first $15,000 may be expended by the district for the 18 purpose of providing financial incentives under section 161A.73 19 to establish management practices for the control of soil 20 erosion on land that is row-cropped, including but not limited 21 to nontill planting, ridge-till planting, and contouring 22 strip-cropping. Of any remaining amount of that appropriation 23 allocated by the department to a district, 30 percent may be 24 expended by the district for that same purpose. 25 e. Not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in 26 paragraph âcâ may be allocated for cost sharing to address 27 complaints filed under section 161A.47 . 28 f. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ, 5 percent 29 shall be allocated for financial incentives to establish 30 practices to protect watersheds above publicly owned lakes of 31 the state from soil erosion and sediment as provided in section 32 161A.73 . 33 g. The division of soil conservation and water quality 34 created within the department pursuant to section 159.5 may 35 -14- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 14/ 22 S.F. _____ allocate moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ to conduct 1 research and demonstration projects to promote conservation 2 tillage and nonpoint source pollution control practices. 3 h. The allocation of moneys as financial incentives as 4 provided in section 161A.73 may be used in combination with 5 moneys allocated by the department of natural resources. 6 i. Not more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated 7 in paragraph âcâ may be used for costs of administration and 8 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 9 5. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION ââ ADMINISTRATION 10 a. For use by the department for costs of administration and 11 implementation of soil and water conservation practices: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,800,000 13 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, $150,000 14 is allocated to support field staff providing technical 15 assistance. 16 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. There is 17 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 18 8.57A to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 19 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 20 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 21 used for the purposes designated: 22 1. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS 23 For regular maintenance and operations of state parks and 24 staff time associated with these activities: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,235,000 26 2. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) 27 To provide local watershed managers with geographic 28 information system data for their use in developing, 29 monitoring, and displaying results of their watershed work: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,000 31 3. WATER QUALITY MONITORING 32 For continuing the establishment and operation of water 33 quality monitoring stations: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,955,000 35 -15- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 15/ 22 S.F. _____ 4. PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM ACCOUNT 1 For deposit in the public water supply system account of the 2 water quality protection fund created in section 455B.183A : 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 4 5. REGULATION OF ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS 5 For the regulation of animal feeding operations, including 6 as provided for in chapters 459 , 459A , and 459B : 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,320,000 8 6. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 9 For supporting floodplain management and dam safety: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 375,000 11 7. AMBIENT AIR QUALITY 12 For the abatement, control, and prevention of ambient 13 air pollution in this state, including measures as necessary 14 to assure attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality 15 standards from particulate matter: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 17 Sec. 16. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA ââ IOWA GEOLOGICAL 18 SURVEY. There is appropriated from the environment first 19 fund created in section 8.57A to the state university of Iowa 20 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 21 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 22 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 23 1. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY OPERATIONS 24 For purposes of supporting the operations of the Iowa 25 geological survey of the state as created within the state 26 university of Iowa pursuant to section 456.1 , including but not 27 limited to providing analysis; data maintenance, collection, 28 and compilation; investigative programs; and information for 29 water supply development and protection: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 31 2. WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 32 For purposes of supporting the Iowa geological survey in 33 measuring, assessing, and evaluating the quantity of water 34 sources in this state and assisting the department of natural 35 -16- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 16/ 22 S.F. _____ resources in regulating water quantity as provided in chapter 1 455B, subchapter III, part 4 , pursuant to sections 455B.262B 2 and 456.14 : 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 495,000 4 Sec. 17. REVERSION. 5 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and 6 notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the 7 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of this 8 Act that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 9 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 10 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 11 the succeeding fiscal year, or until the project for which the 12 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 13 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for 14 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of 15 this Act to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 16 to provide financial assistance for the establishment of 17 permanent soil and water conservation practices that remain 18 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 19 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 20 for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year 21 beginning July 1, 2028. 22 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to moneys transferred 23 pursuant to this division of this Act to the loess hills 24 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 , 25 which shall not revert as provided in that section. 26 DIVISION VI 27 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS 28 Sec. 18. WATER QUALITY INITIATIVE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 29 AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 30 1. There is appropriated from the environment first fund 31 created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 32 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 33 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 34 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 35 -17- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 17/ 22 S.F. _____ designated: 1 For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in 2 section 466B.45 , for purposes of supporting the water quality 3 initiative administered by the division of soil conservation 4 and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including 5 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,375,000 7 2. a. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be 8 used to support projects in subwatersheds as designated by the 9 division that are part of high-priority watersheds identified 10 by the water resources coordinating council established 11 pursuant to section 466B.3 . 12 b. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to 13 support projects in watersheds generally, including regional 14 watersheds, as designated by the division and high-priority 15 watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating 16 council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . 17 3. In supporting projects in subwatersheds and watersheds 18 as provided in subsection 2, all of the following apply: 19 a. The demonstration projects shall utilize water quality 20 practices as described in the Iowa nutrient reduction strategy 21 as defined in section 455B.171 . 22 b. The division shall implement demonstration projects as 23 provided in paragraph âaâ by providing for participation by 24 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in 25 farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide 26 for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a 27 legal interest in agricultural land located within the same 28 subwatershed. 29 c. The division shall implement a demonstration project on 30 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. However, 31 except for edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the 32 amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of 33 establishing the practice as determined by the division or 34 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, 35 -18- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 18/ 22 S.F. _____ whichever is less. 1 d. The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other 2 persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar 3 water quality practices. The division shall promote field day 4 events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish 5 water quality practices on their agricultural land. 6 e. The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 7 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 8 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 9 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 10 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 11 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 12 land shall be a confidential record under section 22.7 . 13 4. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 14 to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages 15 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for 16 farming to implement water quality practices, including the 17 establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and 18 not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. 19 5. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used 20 to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of 21 efforts provided in this section. 22 6. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used by 23 the department to support urban soil and water conservation 24 efforts, which may include but are not limited to management 25 practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of 26 permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. 27 The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided 28 in chapter 161A . 29 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 30 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in 31 subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of this section on a 32 cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to 33 the department from a state or federal source. 34 8. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 35 -19- LSB 1001XC (4) 91 sb/js 19/ 22 S.F. _____ this section may be used to pay for the costs of administering 1 and implementing the water quality initiative by the 2 departmentâs division of soil conservation and water quality as 3 provided in section 466B.42 and this section. 4 DIVISION VII 5 RESOURCES ENHANCEMENT AND PROTECTION ââ OPEN SPACES 6 Sec. 19. REAP ââ IN LIEU OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. In 7 lieu of the standing appropriation in section 455A.18 , there is 8 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 9 8.57A to the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund 10 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 11 30, 2026, the following amount, to be allocated as provided in 12 section 455A.19 : 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,000,000 14 Sec. 20. REAP ââ OPEN SPACES ACCOUNT ââ STATE PARK 15 MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND FACILITY REFURBISHMENT. 16 Notwithstanding section 455A.19, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, 17 subparagraph (1), of the moneys allocated to the open spaces 18 account of the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund, 19 up to $1,000,000 may be used by the department of natural 20 resources for state park maintenance, development, operations, 21 and facility refurbishment for the fiscal year beginning July 22 1, 2025, and ending on June 30, 2026. 23